Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 7

Miscellaneous Provisions

16-15-701. Electronic filing.

Any court governed by this chapter may, by local rule, allow papers to be filed, signed, or verified by electronic means that comply with technological standards promulgated by the supreme court. Pleadings and other papers filed electronically under such local rules shall be considered the same as written papers.

Acts 2018, ch. 809, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-701 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 6; T.C.A., § 16-1118; Acts 1983, ch. 176, § 1), concerning pleading and practice and examination of witnesses in the general sessions courts, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 18.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 809, § 2. July 1, 2018.

16-15-702. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-702 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 3; T.C.A., § 16-1119; Acts 1984, ch. 910, § 1), concerning cost bond or cash deposit in the general sessions court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 19.

16-15-703. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former 16-15-703 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, §§ 7, 16; T.C.A., § 16-1121, 16-1122), concerning costs and fees, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 20.

16-15-704. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-704, concerning civil and criminal dockets, was transferred to § 16-15-304 in 1993.

16-15-705. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-705 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 6; T.C.A., § 16-1118), concerning the scheduling of cases, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 22.

16-15-706. Infants or incompetents — Representation.

Whenever an infant or incompetent person has a representative, such as a general guardian, conservator or other like fiduciary, the representative may sue or defend on behalf of the infant or incompetent person. If an infant or incompetent person does not have a duly appointed representative, or if justice requires, the infant or incompetent person may sue by a next friend. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to defend an action for an infant or incompetent person who does not have a duly appointed representative, or whenever justice requires. The court may, in its discretion, allow the guardian ad litem a reasonable fee for the guardian's services, to be taxed as costs.

Acts 1972, ch. 564, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1128.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

16-15-707. Plaintiffs — Nonsuits — Dismissals.

The plaintiff shall have the right to take a voluntary nonsuit or to dismiss an action without prejudice at any time before the cause is finally submitted to the court, but not afterwards; provided, that such a dismissal operates as an adjudication upon the merits when filed by a plaintiff who has twice dismissed in any court an action based on or including the same claim.

Acts 1972, ch. 564, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1132.

Compiler's Notes. Other procedural provisions for the general sessions courts appear in title 19.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Collateral References. Pretrial Procedure
562.

16-15-708. Subpoena of witnesses.

The attendance of witnesses to give testimony in court or by deposition is procured by subpoena or summons, requiring the witness to be present at a prescribed place and time, to give testimony in a case or matter stated in the subpoena or summons, mentioning the names of the parties litigant and the party at whose instance the witness is to be summoned, and, if necessary, requiring the witness also to bring any books, papers, documents or tangible things stated in the subpoena or summons. The subpoena is issued by a judge or clerk of the court at any time, and to any county within the state, on request of the party wishing the process, and may be served by any person authorized to serve process, by delivering or offering to deliver a copy of the subpoena to the person to whom it is directed. If any person without cause refuses to appear, to testify or to produce evidence when duly subpoenaed to do so, that person shall be committed to jail by the court before whom that person is bound to testify, to remain in jail without bail until willing to testify or give evidence as the law directs.

This section shall govern when a judge or clerk is required to issue a subpoena and the consequences of a person's refusal to appear, testify or produce evidence when subpoenaed pursuant to this section. If any local rule of court conflicts with this section, this section shall prevail and the clerk or other official shall issue subpoenas and the judge shall punish the failure to respond to subpoenas in accordance with this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 564, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 16-1133; Acts 1997, ch. 377, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Other procedural provisions for the general sessions courts appear in title 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 23.10.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. Court order restricting issuance of subpoenas, OAG 96-151 (12/31/96).

16-15-709. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-709 (Acts 1972, ch. 64, § 1; T.C.A. § 16-1134), concerning official records as evidence in the general sessions court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 23.

16-15-710. Commencement of actions — New process when not served.

The suing out of a warrant is the commencement of a civil action within the meaning of this title, whether it is served or not; but if the process is returned unserved, plaintiff, if plaintiff wishes to rely on the original commencement as a bar to the running of a statute of limitations, must either prosecute and continue the action by applying for and obtaining new process from time to time, each new process to be obtained within nine (9) months from return unserved of the previous process, or plaintiff must recommence the action within one (1) year after the return of the initial process not served.

Acts 1972, ch. 564, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1135; Acts 1992, ch. 804, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Other procedural provisions for the general sessions courts appear in title 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 26; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Cited: Vinson v. Mills, 530 S.W.2d 761, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. 1975).

16-15-711. Survival of actions — Substitution of parties.

If a party dies and the claim is not extinguished by the death, the court may order substitution of the proper parties. The motion for substitution may be made by any party or by the successors or representatives of the deceased party and, together with notice of hearing, shall be served on the parties by delivering or mailing a copy of the motion and notice to the parties and shall be served upon persons not parties in the manner provided for service of process. Unless the motion for substitution is made not later than ninety (90) days after the death is suggested in the case by service of a statement of the fact of the death as provided in this subsection (a) for the service of the motion, the action shall be dismissed as to the deceased party.

In the event of the death of one (1) or more of the plaintiffs or one (1) or more of the defendants in an action in which the right sought to be enforced survives only to the surviving plaintiffs or only against the surviving defendants, the action does not abate. The death shall be suggested in the case and the action shall proceed in favor or against the surviving parties.

Acts 1972, ch. 564, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1136.

Compiler's Notes. Other procedural provisions for the general sessions courts appear in title 19.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Collateral References. Parties
62.

16-15-712. Enforcement of judgments — Examination of judgment debtor and others.

In all courts exercising general sessions jurisdiction, the procedure on execution, in proceedings supplementary to and in aid of a judgment, and in proceedings on and in aid of execution shall be in accordance with the statutes of this state and with the general practice followed in the courts of this state. In aid of the judgment or execution, however, the judgment creditor, or the judgment creditor's successor in interest when that interest appears of record, may examine any person, including the judgment debtor, by subpoenaing the person to court, or by conducting discovery in any manner provided by the Tennessee rules of civil procedure.

Acts 1978, ch. 589, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1137; Acts 1999, ch. 277, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Other procedural provisions for the general sessions courts appear in title 19.

Cross-References. Depositions, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 27-32.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of general sessions court to issue post-judgment subpoenas, OAG 98-0124 (7/20/98).

Procedure for conducting post-judgment discovery in general sessions court, OAG 98-0124 (7/20/98).

16-15-713. Attachments and contempts.

Notwithstanding any provision of the law or private act to the contrary, courts of general sessions have the power to issue attachments and inflict punishments for contempts of court. The punishments for contempts shall be limited to:

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) and imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days if the judge of the general sessions court is licensed to practice law; and

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) if the judge of the general sessions court is not licensed to practice law.

Courts of general sessions have the power to punish for contempt persons who fail to appear for traffic violations.

Acts 1985, ch. 324, § 2; 1986, ch. 484, § 1; 1987, ch. 12, § 1; 1987, ch. 34, § 1; 1988, ch. 656, § 1; 1990, ch. 647, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 410, § 1; 1992, ch. 804, § 2; 1998, ch. 682, § 9.

Cross-References. Punishment for contempt, § 29-9-103.

Attorney General Opinions. General sessions court contempt powers, OAG 89-08 (1/26/89).

Limitation of contempt powers, OAG 89-15 (2/8/89).

16-15-714. Pleadings and practice — General sessions courts.

Practice and pleadings in the general sessions courts shall be as provided in this chapter and other provisions of law and private acts establishing the courts and local rules of practice not inconsistent with law.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

Attorney General Opinions. Sheriff's authority to serve process for general sessions courts, OAG 94-146 (12/29/94).

Cited: Graham v. Walldorf Prop. Mgmt., — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 107 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 19, 2009).

16-15-715. Court bailiffs.

The sheriff shall, unless otherwise provided, provide sufficient bailiffs to serve the general sessions courts.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

Attorney General Opinions. Sheriff has the duty to appoint court officers for general sessions courts, except in municipalities having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than 450,000, OAG 05-026 (3/21/05).

Appointment of court officer authorized to carry weapon in courtrooms; required training, qualifications, etc. OAG 10-77, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (6/1/10).

POST certification of bailiffs and court officers. OAG 10-107, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (10/28/10).

16-15-716. Warrants.

A civil action in the general sessions courts is commenced by a civil warrant being filed with the clerk in substance as follows:

State of Tennessee

County

To any lawful process server to execute and return: summon

defendant to appear before the general sessions court of this county in

address city or

, at on to answer plaintiff(s) in

county, time date

a civil action for

(include as many lines as necessary)

under dollars. This

date

clerk/deputy

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25; 2017, ch. 267, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “being filed with” for “issued by” in the introductory language.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 267, § 2. May 4, 2017.

Cited: West v. AMISUB (SFH), Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2013 Tenn. App. LEXIS 191 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 21, 2013).

16-15-717. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-717 (Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25), concerning service of process and the issuance of civil warrants, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 991, § 1.

16-15-718. Fees to clerk.

Before the issuance of any original process in a civil action, the plaintiff shall deposit with the clerk a sum that the clerk has previously established as adequate to pay the usual costs, including litigation taxes as calculated in accordance with § 8-21-401, and any local litigation tax as authorized by a private act. The clerk may allow a cost bond with adequate security in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500); provided, that any eligible plaintiff may proceed on a pauper's oath instead of the cash deposit or cost bond.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

16-15-719. Appeal bond.

An appeal bond returned with other papers to the circuit court is a conclusive presumption that an appeal was taken.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

16-15-720. Continuances.

A continuance may be granted in the judge's discretion.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

Attorney General Opinions. General sessions judge's legal authority, OAG 00-001 (1/4/00).

16-15-721. Rules of evidence — Application.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, the Tennessee rules of evidence shall be fully applicable in general sessions courts.

Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 25.

16-15-722. Attachment.

General sessions courts have jurisdiction as in subsection (b) to proceed by attachment against the property of the defendant, in the same way as the courts of record, under the rules, regulations and provisions in this code prescribed in regard to proceedings by attachment, as far as they are applicable and not controlled by other express provisions.

The jurisdiction of general sessions courts in attachment cases is limited to the amount of their jurisdiction over the subject matter of suit or cause of action.

Code 1858, §§ 4173, 4174; Shan., §§ 5985, 5986; Code 1932, §§ 10186, 10187; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-405, 19-406; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 33; T.C.A., § 19-1-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 4, 107, 110.

16-15-723. Proceedings after attachment.

The proceedings after the issuance and service of attachment and on the trial and enforcement of the plaintiff's claim, are the same as if the suit had been commenced in the ordinary way, the rights acquired by the attachment being governed by the provisions of this code regulating attachments.

Code 1858, § 4175; Shan., § 5987; Code 1932, § 10188; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-407; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 34; T.C.A., § 19-1-106.

Cited: Smith v. Thomas, 1 Shannon 655 (1876).

Collateral References. Justices of the peace
147(7).

16-15-724. Cross actions.

Cross actions shall be instituted by cross summons to be filed any day before the day of trial, unless a nonresident defendant enters an appearance and waives publication. In such case, the cross summons shall be filed within two (2) whole days after entry of appearance. In all such actions instituted before courts of general sessions, the case shall not be set for trial until the fourth day after the date of service of original summons, or return date of any publication for a nonresident, or date of entry of appearance of a nonresident.

Acts 1939, ch. 180, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8749.1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-416; Acts 1993, ch. 241, 40; T.C.A., § 19-1-112.

Cross-References. Cross actions and counterclaims, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 13.

Collateral References. Justices of the peace
93.

16-15-725. Judgment for defendant on setoff.

If the defendant pleads a setoff to the plaintiff's debt, and it appears that there is a balance due in favor of the defendant, the general sessions court shall enter up judgment in favor of the defendant and against the plaintiff for the balance. If the plaintiff fails in establishing any demand against the defendant, the defendant shall have a judgment against the plaintiff for the amount that the proof upon the defendant's cross action shows that the defendant is entitled to, with costs.

If the residue upon the defendant's setoff, after satisfying the plaintiff's debt, exceeds the court's jurisdiction, the defendant may enter on the court's docket a satisfaction of so much of the defendant's claim as the amount of the plaintiff's demand, as ascertained by the court, and tender the plaintiff a receipt for the amount thus setoff, in which case judgment shall be rendered in favor of the defendant for costs.

Code 1858, §§ 4160, 4162 (deriv. Acts 1815, ch. 53, § 1); Acts 1879, ch. 222, § 1; Shan., §§ 5973, 5975; Code 1932, §§ 10174, 10176; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-417, 19-419; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 41; T.C.A., § 19-1-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 14; 22 Tenn. Juris., Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 13.

16-15-726. Remittitur.

If the sum found for either plaintiff or defendant exceeds the jurisdiction of the general sessions court, that party may remit the excess, and take judgment for the residue, but the party cannot afterwards sue for the amount so remitted.

Code 1858, § 4161; Shan., § 5974; Code 1932, § 10175; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-418; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 42; T.C.A., § 19-1-114.

Cross-References. Additur, § 20-10-101.

Remittitur, §§ 20-10-102, 20-10-103.

16-15-727. Correction of judgment — Mistakes, inadvertence, excusable neglect and fraud.

Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.01, regarding clerical mistakes, shall apply to all courts of general sessions. The general sessions judge shall have the authority under the same circumstances and in the same manner as is provided in Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.01 to correct such mistakes.

Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.02, regarding mistakes, inadvertence, excusable neglect, fraud and other similar reasons set out in that rule, shall apply to all courts of general sessions. A motion under the general sessions court's authority under Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.02 shall be filed within ten (10) days of the date of judgment. Once filed, the motion shall toll the ten-day period for seeking de novo review in the circuit court until the determination of the motion is concluded. Thereafter, an appeal for de novo review in the circuit court shall be filed within ten (10) days of the general sessions court's ruling on the motion to relieve a party or the parties' legal representative from a final judgment, order or proceeding in the same manner as provided in Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.02.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 109; Shan., § 4600; mod. Code 1932, § 8724; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-423; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 44; T.C.A., § 19-1-116; Acts 2004, ch. 875, § 1; 2007, ch. 443, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References in some of the annotations for this section to “justices of the peace” are deemed references to “courts of general sessions” or “judges of courts of general sessions.” See Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Revival of judgments, § 25-4-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 30.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of general sessions judge to correct a judgment, OAG 04-090 (5/10/04).

Cited: Jackson Energy Auth. v. Diamond, 181 S.W.3d 735, 2005 Tenn. App. LEXIS 22 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2005); Benson v. Herbst, 240 S.W.3d 235, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 317 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 18, 2007); Tenn. Prot. Agency, Inc. v. Mathies, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 465 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 23, 2010).

16-15-728. Proceedings presumed valid.

Every intendment is in favor of the sufficiency and validity of proceedings before general sessions courts, when brought in question, either directly or collaterally, in any of the courts, where it appears on the face of the proceedings that the general sessions court had jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties.

Code 1858, § 4176 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 100, § 1); Shan., § 5988; Code 1932, § 10189; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-424; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 45; T.C.A., § 19-1-117.

Compiler's Notes. References in some of the annotations for this section to “justices of the peace” are deemed references to “courts of general sessions” or “judges of courts of general sessions.” See Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 232; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 13, 25, 27.

Cited: State v. McClintock, 732 S.W.2d 268, 1987 Tenn. LEXIS 1063 (Tenn. 1987); State v. Cottrell, 868 S.W.2d 673, 1992 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 940 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1992).

16-15-729. Trial de novo on appeal — Decision on merits.

No civil case, originating in a general sessions court and carried to a higher court, shall be dismissed by such court for any informality whatever, but shall be tried on its merits; and the court shall allow all amendments in the form of action, the parties thereto, or the statement of the cause of action, necessary to reach the merits, upon such terms as may be deemed just and proper. The trial shall be de novo, including damages.

Code 1858, § 4177 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 100, § 2); Shan., § 5989; mod. Code 1932, § 10190; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-425; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 46; T.C.A., § 19-1-118; Acts 1995, ch. 418, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References in some of the annotations for this section to “justices of the peace” are deemed references to “courts of general sessions” or “judges of courts of general sessions.” See Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Correction of formal errors on appeal, § 20-11-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Amendments, §§ 2, 7, 9, 14, 17; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 50; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 27, 41, 43.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Cited: Red Boiling Springs v. Whitley, 777 S.W.2d 706, 1989 Tenn. App. LEXIS 457 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1989); Steve Frost Agency v. Spurlock, 859 S.W.2d 337, 1993 Tenn. App. LEXIS 213 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1993); Morris v. Clarksville-Montgomery County Consol. Bd. of Educ., 867 S.W.2d 324, 1993 Tenn. App. LEXIS 511 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1993); Auto Credit of Nashville v. Wimmer, 231 S.W.3d 896, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 642 (Tenn. Aug. 16, 2007); McPherson v. Shea Ear Clinic, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 265 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 27, 2007); McGee v. Jacobs, 236 S.W.3d 162, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 320 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 18, 2007); West v. AMISUB (SFH), Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2013 Tenn. App. LEXIS 191 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 21, 2013).

16-15-730. Presumption of regularity of execution.

If the judgment is rendered by one general sessions judge, and execution is issued by another, and in all other cases where steps appear to be taken by one judge instead of another, the presumption, in the absence of proof to the contrary, is that the execution was issued and steps taken regularly.

Code 1858, § 4138; Shan., § 5950; Code 1932, § 10151; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-435; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 48; T.C.A., § 19-1-120.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 30, 32.

16-15-731. Actions in the nature of interpleader.

Notwithstanding any rule of court or any law to the contrary, actions in the nature of interpleader, in which the value of the money that is the subject of the action does not exceed the jurisdictional limit of the general sessions court, may be filed in general sessions court under this part. Any such action involving money in the custody or possession of a person acting in the capacity of a real estate broker may be filed on forms prescribed by the Tennessee real estate commission pursuant to its authority under § 62-13-203.

The failure of a competing claimant to recover in an interpleader action shall not be considered as a judgment against the competing claimant, and shall not be used to impair the credit of the claimant.

Acts 1987, ch. 331, § 1; 1988, ch. 523, § 1; 1991, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 241, § 49; T.C.A., § 19-1-121.

Attorney General Opinions. Interpleader actions by real estate brokers as unauthorized practice of law. OAG 14-08, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (1/14/14).

16-15-732. Removal of actions — Exceptions.

At any time at least three (3) or more business days prior to the scheduled trial date of a civil action commenced in general sessions court, any defendant in the action may apply to have the action and all the papers of the action removed to a court having jurisdiction of appeals from courts of general sessions. A case properly removed pursuant to this section shall be tried by the appellate court in the same manner as appeals from general sessions court civil actions are currently tried, except there shall be no default or other judgment entered at the general sessions level, and except that a case removed pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any monetary jurisdictional limit that would have applied in the general sessions court if the case had not been removed.

Any defendant seeking to remove an action pursuant to subsection (a) shall file with the application an affidavit stating that the defendant has a substantial defense to the action and/or that the defendant's defense will be of such a complex or expensive nature that the interests of justice require that the defendant not be required to present the defense at the general sessions level. The affidavit shall state the grounds of the defense and why the affiant believes it to be sufficiently substantial, complex or expensive to merit the removal of the case. The affidavit and application shall also be accompanied by a cost bond sufficient to defray all costs that have accrued prior to the time application for removal is made.

If the general sessions judge finds that a defendant's defense is substantial, complex or expensive to present, and that the defendant has posted a sufficient cost bond, the judge shall order the action removed to the court that would have jurisdiction of an appeal if the action had been tried in general sessions court. The judge shall direct the clerk to promptly transmit the papers in the action to the clerk of the court to which the action is removed.

If the judge finds the defense will not be substantial, complex or expensive or that the cost bond is not sufficient, the judge shall deny the application and proceed to try the action.

If an action is removed pursuant to this section, in no event shall an objection to venue be considered by the circuit court, unless raised by a defendant in the defendant's affidavit in support of removal filed in the general sessions court.

This section does not apply in any county having a population of not less than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000) nor more than seven hundred eighty thousand (780,000), according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1988, ch. 732, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 241, § 50; T.C.A., § 19-1-122; Acts 1994, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 690, § 2 provided that the act is remedial in nature and is declarative of the general assembly's intent in enacting Acts 1988, ch. 732.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cited: Benson v. Herbst, 240 S.W.3d 235, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 317 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 18, 2007); Cruzen v. Awad, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 404 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 25, 2010).

16-15-733. Motions against officers.

Sheriffs, coroners, constables, and their sureties are liable to judgment by motion for the amount to which the plaintiff is entitled, with interest, and damages at the rate of twelve and one half percent (12.5%) in the following cases:

In the general sessions court of the county where such officer, by virtue of the officer's position, collects or receives money upon any debt or demand, under a magistrate's jurisdiction, put into the officer's hands for collection, and fails to pay it over to the person entitled, whether the officer collected or received the money before or after the issuance of a warrant, or before or after the rendition of judgment;

In the general sessions court having legal custody of the papers, where an execution from a general sessions court having come to the officer's hands, the officer fails to return it within thirty (30) days after its issuance, or where, having collected money on execution issued by a general sessions court, the officer fails or refuses to pay it; and

In the general sessions court of the county on motion by any general sessions judge or witness, for failing to pay over costs on execution, collected and due the officer, or failing to return execution issued for the cost; and any number of cases in favor of one (1) general sessions judge or witness may be joined in one (1) motion.

The inability of the officer to make due return of an execution under subsection (a) on account of sickness, high water or engagement in executing any precept on behalf of the state shall be sufficient excuse to discharge the officer from the penalties prescribed.

The officer, if to be found in the county, shall have five (5) days' notice, in writing, of the time and place of motion.

Before the plaintiff is entitled to judgment against the sureties, the plaintiff shall produce to the court a certified copy of the official bond of the officer.

Code 1858, §§ 4167-4170 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, §§ 4, 5; Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 6; Acts 1841-1842, ch. 37); Shan., §§ 5979-5982; Code 1932, §§ 10180-10183; modified; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-501 — 19-504; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 51; T.C.A., § 19-2-101.

Cross-References. Concurrent jurisdiction of circuit court, § 25-3-141.

Defense of mailing to another county, § 25-3-109.

Excuse of inability to return, § 25-3-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 246; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 39; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 26; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, §§ 3-7; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 24.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part II, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 730.

16-15-734. Motion by surety or stayor.

When any surety or stayor is compelled to pay a general sessions court's judgment against a principal debtor for which the surety or stayor is liable, the surety or stayor may, by motion, before the general sessions court having legal custody of the judgment, recover judgment against the principal debtor for the judgment with interest and costs, or against a cosurety or stayor, for the ratable part thereof, which judgment is not liable to be stayed, except by consent of the surety or stayor in writing.

Code 1858, § 4171 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 38, § 3); Shan., § 5983; mod. Code 1932, § 10184; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-505; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 52; T.C.A., § 19-2-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motion and Summary Proceedings, §§ 4-6.

16-15-735. Notice to plaintiff of possible additional defendants.

In cases or controversies arising in a court of general sessions, if a defendant feels that the defendant is either not at fault or that another person is also at fault, the defendant is to notify the opposing party or parties and the clerk of the court in writing forty-eight (48) hours prior to the scheduled date of the hearing of the names, if known, of the other person or persons at fault. If the defendant fails to so notify, the plaintiff shall be entitled to a continuance.

After receiving notice that additional defendants may exist, the clerk of the court shall notify the plaintiff of this fact. The clerk shall automatically continue the hearing for thirty (30) days following notification to the plaintiff that additional defendants exist so the plaintiff can issue service and amend the warrant to include any new defendants.

Acts 1997, ch. 522, § 1.